North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 19B. The Secure and Fair Enforcement Mortgage Licensing Act.
§ 53-244.060.
Issuance of license or registration.

If an applicant satisfies the requirements of

G.S. 53-244.050

, the Commissioner shall issue a mortgage lender, mortgage broker, mortgage servicer, mortgage loan originator, or transitional mortgage loan originator license, or a mortgage origination support registrant registration, unless the Commissioner finds any of the following:

The applicant has had a mortgage loan originator or mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage servicer license, or mortgage origination support registrant registration or its equivalent, revoked in any governmental jurisdiction, except that a subsequent formal vacation of the revocation shall not be deemed a revocation.

The applicant or its controlling persons have been convicted of or plead guilty or nolo contendere to a felony in a domestic, foreign, or military court:

During the seven-year period preceding the date of the application for licensing and registration; or

At any time preceding the date of application, if the felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, a breach of trust, or money laundering.

A pardon of a conviction shall not be a conviction for purposes of this subdivision.

The applicant or any of its controlling persons have been convicted of or plead guilty or nolo contendere to any charge in a domestic, foreign, or military court, within the past five years, of a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude or any fraud, false statement or omission, any theft or wrongful taking of property, bribery, perjury, forgery, counterfeiting, extortion, or conspiracy to commit any of these offenses, or involving any financial service or financial service-related business.

The applicant has demonstrated a lack of financial responsibility, character, or general fitness such as to fail to command the confidence of the community and to warrant a determination that the mortgage loan originator, transitional mortgage loan originator, or other licensee or registrant will operate honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the purposes of this Article. For purposes of this subdivision, a person shows a lack of financial responsibility when the person has shown a disregard in the management of the person’s own financial affairs. Evidence that a person has not shown financial responsibility may include:

Current outstanding judgments, except judgments resulting solely from medical expenses;

Current outstanding tax liens or other government liens and filings;

Foreclosures within the past three years; or

A pattern of serious delinquent accounts within the past three years.

The mortgage loan originator applicant has failed to complete the prelicensing education requirement described in

G.S. 53-244.070

.

The mortgage loan originator applicant has failed to pass a written test that meets the requirements described in

G.S. 53-244.080

.

The mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage servicer applicant has failed to meet the surety bond requirement described in

G.S. 53-244.103

.

The mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage servicer applicant fails to meet the minimum net worth requirement as described in

G.S. 53-244.104

.

The applicant’s participation in the mortgage business will not be in the public interest.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2013-327, s. 4; 2015-293, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-327, s. 4, effective September 1, 2013, in the undesignated provisions of this section, added “or transitional mortgage loan originator” and made a minor stylistic change; and added “transitional mortgage loan originator” in subdivision (4). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2015-293, s. 1, effective November 1, 2015, inserted “or registration” in the section heading; inserted “or a mortgage origination support registrant registration” in the introductory language; inserted “or mortgage origination support registrant registration or its equivalent” in subdivision (1); and inserted “or registrant” in the first sentence of subdivision (4). For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 53-244.070.
Educational requirements for mortgage loan originators.

In order to be eligible to apply for a mortgage loan originator license, an individual must complete at least 24 hours of prelicensing education approved in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, which shall include:

Three hours of federal law and regulations;

Three hours of ethics, including instruction on fraud, consumer protection, and fair lending issues;

Two hours of training related to lending standards for nontraditional mortgage products; and

Four hours of North Carolina laws and regulations.

Prelicensing education courses and the course providers shall be reviewed and approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry using reasonable standards consistently applied, subject to the Commissioner’s approval of any course of study required by subdivision (a)(4) of this section. Review and approval of a prelicensing education course shall include review and approval of the course provider.

Nothing in this section shall preclude any prelicensing education course, approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, that is provided by the employer of the applicant or an entity that is affiliated with the applicant by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of the employer or entity.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, prelicensing education may be offered only in a classroom or classroom equivalent setting, as approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

An individual having successfully completed the prelicensing educational requirements in any other state, if the requirements have been approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, shall be given credit for those hours toward the completion of the prelicensing requirements in this State, other than the hours required under subdivision (a)(4) of this section.

An individual previously licensed under this Article whose license expires and who requests a late renewal of license pursuant to

G.S. 53-244.101

must prove that the individual has completed all of the continuing education requirements for the preceding year.

History.

2009-374, s. 2.

§ 53-244.080.
Testing requirements for mortgage loan originators.

An individual must pass a qualified written test, as defined by subsection (b) of this section, developed by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry and administered by a test provider approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. In addition, prior to licensure in this State, an individual must take a qualified written test that tests the individual’s knowledge and comprehension of North Carolina law and regulation.

A written test shall not be treated as a qualified written test unless the test adequately measures the applicant’s knowledge and comprehension in the following subject areas:

Ethics;

Federal law and regulation pertaining to mortgage origination;

North Carolina law and regulation pertaining to mortgage origination; and

Federal and North Carolina law and regulations relating to fraud, consumer protection, nontraditional mortgage products, and fair lending issues.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a test provider approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry from providing a test at the location of the employer of the applicant or the location of any subsidiary or affiliate of the employer of the applicant, or the location of any entity which is licensed by North Carolina to engage in the mortgage lending business.

An applicant shall be considered to have passed a qualified written test provided the applicant achieves a test score of at least seventy-five percent (75%) correct answers to questions. In addition, an applicant shall not be considered to have passed a qualified written test if the individual did not achieve a test score of at least seventy-five percent (75%) correct answers to questions related to North Carolina law and regulation.

An applicant may retake a test three consecutive times with each consecutive test occurring at least 30 days after the preceding test. After failing three consecutive tests, an applicant must wait at least six months before retaking the test. A licensed mortgage loan originator who fails to maintain a valid license for a period of five years or longer must retake the test.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2013-412, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-412, s. 2, effective August 23, 2013, substituted “five years” for “three years” in the last sentence of subsection (e).

§ 53-244.090.
Application fees.

Every applicant for initial licensure shall pay a nonrefundable filing fee of one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250) for licensure as a mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or mortgage servicer, three hundred dollars ($300.00) for licensure as an exclusive mortgage broker, or one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00) for licensure as a mortgage loan originator or transitional mortgage loan originator.Every applicant for initial registration as a mortgage origination support registrant shall pay a nonrefundable filing fee of (i) two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for applicants who employ or contract with fewer than a total of five individuals engaged solely as loan processors or underwriters, (ii) one thousand dollars ($1,000) for applicants who employ or contract with between a total of five and 30 individuals engaged solely as loan processors or underwriters, or (iii) two thousand dollars ($2,000) for applicants who employ or contract with more than a total of 30 individuals engaged solely as loan processors or underwriters.In addition, every applicant for initial licensure or registration must pay the actual cost of obtaining a credit report, State and national criminal history record checks, and the processing fees required by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

Each principal and each branch office of a mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensed under the provisions of this Article shall be issued a separate license for which the Commissioner shall assess a nonrefundable filing fee of three hundred dollars ($300.00) in addition to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry processing fee. A licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender shall file with the Commissioner a notice on a form prescribed by the Commissioner that identifies the address of the principal office and each branch office and its designated branch manager. Payment of the license fee under subsection (a) of this section shall be deemed to cover the location license fee for the principal office of each mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage servicer without payment of an additional three hundred dollars ($300.00) under this subsection.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2010-168, s. 4; 2013-327, s. 5; 2015-293, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-168, s. 4, effective September 1, 2010, in subsection (b), twice substituted “three hundred dollars ($300.00)” for “one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00).”

Session Laws 2013-327, s. 5, effective September 1, 2013, added “or transitional mortgage loan originator” to the end of the first sentence in subsection (a). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2015-293, s. 1, effective November 1, 2015, substituted “Application fees” for “License application fees” in the section heading; and in subsection (a), inserted the second paragraph and substituted “every applicant for initial licensure or registration” for “an applicant” in the present third paragraph. For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 53-244.100.
Active license or registration requirements and assignability.

It is unlawful for any person to engage in the mortgage business without first obtaining a license as a mortgage loan originator, transitional mortgage loan originator, mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage servicer issued by the Commissioner under this Article. It is unlawful for any person to employ, to compensate, or to appoint as its agent a mortgage loan originator unless the person is a licensed mortgage loan originator or a transitional mortgage loan originator under this Article. Persons defined in G.S. 53-244.030(8) or G.S. 53-244.030(29) are not subject to this subsection.

The license of a mortgage loan originator or transitional mortgage loan originator is not effective during any period when that person is not employed by (i) a mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage servicer licensed under this Article or (ii) a mortgage origination support registrant registered under this Article, but only for the purpose of supervising and controlling loan processors or underwriters. When a mortgage loan originator or transitional mortgage loan originator ceases to be employed by a mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage servicer licensed under this Article, or a mortgage origination support registrant registered under this Article, the mortgage loan originator or transitional mortgage loan originator and the mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage servicer licensed under this Article, or the mortgage origination support registrant registered under this Article, by whom that person was employed shall promptly notify the Commissioner in writing. The mortgage lender, mortgage broker, mortgage servicer, or mortgage origination support registrant shall include a statement of the specific reason for the termination of the mortgage loan originator’s or transitional mortgage loan originator’s employment. A mortgage loan originator or transitional mortgage loan originator shall not be employed simultaneously by more than one mortgage lender, mortgage broker, mortgage servicer, or mortgage support registrant licensed or registered under this Article.

Each mortgage lender, mortgage broker, mortgage servicer, and mortgage origination support registrant licensed or registered under this Article shall maintain on file with the Commissioner a list of all mortgage loan originators and transitional mortgage loan originators who are employed with the mortgage lender, mortgage broker, mortgage servicer, or mortgage origination support registrant.

No person, other than an exempt person, shall hold himself or herself out as a mortgage lender, a mortgage broker, a mortgage servicer, a mortgage loan originator, a transitional mortgage loan originator, or mortgage origination support registrant unless the person is licensed or registered in accordance with this Article.

Licenses and registrations issued under this Article are not assignable. Control of a licensee or registrant shall not be acquired through a stock purchase, merger, or other device without the prior written consent of the Commissioner. The Commissioner shall not give written consent if the Commissioner finds that any of the grounds for denial, revocation, or suspension of a license or registration are applicable to the acquiring person.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2013-327, s. 6; 2015-293, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-327, s. 6, effective September 1, 2013, added “or transitional mortgage loan originator” or similar language throughout subsections (a) through (d); and made a minor stylistic change in subsection (d). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2015-293, s. 1, effective November 1, 2015, inserted “or registration” in the section heading; inserted “or a mortgage origination support registrant registered under this Article,” “or registered,” and similar language referring to registrants and registration throughout subsections (b) through (e); in subsection (b), added clause (ii) in the first sentence and substituted “was employed” for “is employed” in the second sentence; and made related changes. For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 53-244.100A.
Assessments.

For the purpose of meeting the cost of regulation under this Article, each mortgage lender, mortgage broker, and mortgage servicer licensed under this Article shall pay into the OCOB an assessment as provided in this subsection. The annual assessment shall consist of a base amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) for volumes of no more than one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) plus an additional sum, calculated on the loan and servicing dollar volume reported by the licensee to the OCOB for the previous calendar year. If a licensee has both loan and servicing volume, those amounts shall be added together and the assessment shall be calculated from the table below as follows:

Click to view

The Commissioner may collect the assessment provided for in subsection (a) of this section annually or in periodic installments as approved by the Commission.

Loan and/or Servicing Dollar Volume Per Thousand $1,500,001 to $2,500,000 $0.07 $2,500,001 to $5,000,000 $0.06 $5,000,001 to $10,000,000 $0.05 $10,000,001 to $30,000,000 $0.04 $30,000,001 to $100,000,000 $0.03 $100,000,001 to $1,300,000,000 $0.02 More Than $1,300,000,001 $0.01

History.

2012-37, s. 1.

§ 53-244.101.
License and registration renewal.

All licenses and registrations issued by the Commissioner under the provisions of this Article shall expire annually on the 31st day of December following issuance or on any other date that the Commissioner may determine. The license is invalid after that date and shall remain invalid unless renewed under subsection (b) of this section.

A license or registration may be renewed on or after November 1 of each year by complying with the requirements of subsection (c) of this section.A mortgage loan originator shall pay a nonrefundable renewal fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00) plus the actual cost of obtaining credit reports and State and national criminal history record checks and processing fees for the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry as the Commissioner shall require.A mortgage origination support registrant shall pay a nonrefundable renewal fee of (i) one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00) for registrants who employ or contract with fewer than a total of five individuals engaged solely as loan processors or underwriters, (ii) five hundred dollars ($500.00) for registrants who employ or contract with between a total of five and 30 individuals engaged solely as loan processors or underwriters, or (iii) one thousand dollars ($1,000) for registrants who employ or contract with more than a total of 30 individuals engaged solely as loan processors or underwriters. In addition to the nonrefundable renewal fee, a mortgage support registrant shall pay the actual cost of obtaining credit reports and State and national criminal history record checks and processing fees for the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry as the Commissioner shall require.

Licensees may apply to renew a mortgage loan originator, mortgage lender, mortgage broker, and mortgage servicer license, and registrants may apply to renew a mortgage origination support registrant registration. The application for renewal shall demonstrate that all of the following applicable requirements are met:

The licensee or registrant continues to meet the initial minimum standards for licensure or registration under

G.S. 53-244.060

.

The mortgage loan originator has satisfied the annual continuing education requirements described in

G.S. 53-244.102

.

The licensee or registrant has paid all required fees and assessments.

If a mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage servicer’s license is not renewed prior to the expiration date, then the licensee shall pay two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) as a nonrefundable late fee. If a mortgage loan originator’s license is not renewed prior to the expiration date, then the licensee shall pay a nonrefundable late fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) in addition to the renewal fee set forth in subsection (b) of this section. In the event a licensee fails to obtain a reinstatement of the license prior to March 1, the Commissioner shall require the licensee to comply with the requirements for the initial issuance of a license under the provisions of this Article.

(d1)

If a mortgage origination support registrant registration is not renewed prior to the expiration date, in addition to the renewal fees set forth in subsection (b) of this section, the registrant shall pay a nonrefundable late fee of (i) sixty-two dollars and fifty cents ($62.50) for registrants who employ or contract with fewer than a total of five individuals engaged solely as loan processors or underwriters, (ii) two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for persons who employ or contract with between a total of five and 30 individuals engaged solely as loan processors or underwriters, or (iii) five hundred dollars ($500.00) for persons who employ or contract with more than a total of 30 individuals engaged solely as loan processors or underwriters.In the event a registrant fails to obtain a reinstatement of the registration prior to March 1, the Commissioner shall require the registrant to comply with the requirements for the initial issuance of a registration under the provisions of this Article.

When required by the Commissioner, each person shall furnish to the Commissioner the person’s consent to a criminal history record check and a set of the person’s fingerprints in a form acceptable to the Commissioner or to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. Refusal to consent to a criminal history record check shall constitute grounds for the Commissioner to deny renewal of the license of the person as well as the license of any other person by whom the person is employed, over which the person has control, or as to which the person is the current or proposed qualifying individual or current or proposed branch manager.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2010-168, s. 5; 2011-326, s. 26; 2012-37, s. 2; 2015-293, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-168, s. 5, as amended by Session Laws 2011-326, s. 26, effective June 27, 2011, substituted “three hundred dollars ($300.00)” for “one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00)” in subdivision (b)(1), and “one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00)” for “sixty-seven dollars and fifty cents ($67.50)” in subdivision (b)(2).

Session Laws 2012-37, s. 2, effective October 1, 2012, rewrote subsection (b), which formerly read: “(b) A license may be renewed on or after November 1 of each year by complying with the requirements of subsection (c) of this section and by paying to the Commissioner, in addition to the actual cost of obtaining credit reports and State and national criminal history record checks and of processing fees of the nationwide system as the Commissioner shall require, nonrefundable renewal fees as follows: (1) Licensed mortgage lenders, licensed mortgage brokers, and licensed mortgage servicers shall pay an annual renewal fee of six hundred twenty-five dollars ($ 625.00), licensed exclusive mortgage brokers shall pay an annual renewal fee of three hundred dollars ($ 300.00), and licensed mortgage lenders and mortgage brokers shall pay three hundred dollars ($ 300.00) for each licensed branch office. (2) Licensed mortgage loan originators shall pay an annual renewal fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($ 125.00)”; substituted “fees and assessments” for “fees for renewal of the license” in subdivision (c)(3); and substituted “nonrefundable late fee” for “nonrefundable late fee in addition to the renewal fee set forth in subsection (b) of this section” in the first sentence in subsection (d).

Session Laws 2015-293, s. 1, effective November 1, 2015, inserted “and registration” in the section heading; inserted “and registrations” near the beginning of subsection (a); in subsection (b), inserted “or registration” in the first sentence and added the third paragraph; rewrote subsection (c); and inserted subsection (d1). For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 53-244.102.
Continuing education for mortgage loan originators.

A licensed mortgage loan originator shall annually complete at least eight hours of continuing education approved in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, including:

Three hours of federal law and regulations;

Two hours of ethics, including instruction on fraud, consumer protection, and fair lending issues;

Two hours of training related to lending standards for nontraditional mortgage products; and

One hour of North Carolina law and regulations.

Continuing education courses shall be reviewed and approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry based upon reasonable standards. Approval of a continuing education course shall include approval of the course provider.

Nothing in this section shall preclude any continuing education course, approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, that is provided by the employer of the mortgage loan originator or an entity affiliated with the mortgage loan originator by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of such employer or entity. Continuing education may be offered either in a classroom, online, or by any other means approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

A licensed mortgage loan originator:

Except for

G.S. 53-244.070(a)

and subsection (e) of this section, may receive credit for a continuing education course taken prior to the end of the reinstatement period under G.S. 53-244.101(d); and

May not take the same approved course in the same or successive years to meet the annual requirements for continuing education.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who is an approved instructor of an approved continuing education course may receive credit for the licensed mortgage loan originator’s own annual continuing education requirement at the rate of two hours credit for every one hour taught.

A licensee having successfully completed the education requirements approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry in subdivisions (a)(1), (a)(2), and (a)(3) of this section for any state shall be accepted as credit toward completion of continuing education requirements in North Carolina.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2013-412, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-412, s. 3, effective August 23, 2013, in subdivision (d)(1), deleted “only” preceding “receive credit,” and substituted “taken prior to the end of the reinstatement period under G.S. 53-244.101(d)” for “in the year in which the course is taken” at the end.

§ 53-244.103.
Surety bond requirements.

Except as provided in subsection (a1) of this section, each mortgage loan originator or transitional mortgage loan originator shall be covered by a surety bond through employment with a licensee in accordance with this section. The surety bond shall provide coverage for each mortgage loan originator or transitional mortgage loan originator employed by the licensee in an amount as prescribed by subsection (b) of this section and shall be in a form prescribed by the Commissioner. The Commissioner may adopt rules with respect to the requirements for the surety bonds as needed to accomplish the purposes of the Article.

(a1)

The requirements of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to a mortgage loan originator or transitional mortgage loan originator employed only by a registrant for the sole purpose of supervising and controlling loan processors or underwriters.

Licensees shall be required to post a surety bond with the Commissioner at application to be subsequently adjusted as follows:

A mortgage broker shall post a minimum surety bond of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000). Provided, however, if a mortgage broker has originated mortgage loans in North Carolina in a 12-month period ending December 31 in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) but less than fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), then the mortgage broker’s minimum bond amount shall be one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000), and if a mortgage broker has originated mortgage loans in North Carolina in a 12-month period ending December 31 of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) or more, the mortgage broker’s minimum bond shall be two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

A mortgage lender or mortgage servicer shall post a minimum surety bond of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). Provided, however, if a mortgage lender has originated mortgage loans in North Carolina in a 12-month period ending December 31 in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) but less than fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), then the mortgage lender’s minimum bond amount shall be two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), and if a mortgage lender has originated mortgage loans in North Carolina in a 12-month period ending December 31 of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) or more, then the mortgage lender’s minimum bond shall be five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

Any increased surety bond required under subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection shall be filed with the Commissioner on or before May 31 immediately following the end of the 12-month December 31 period.

The surety bond shall be in a form satisfactory to the Commissioner and shall run to the State for the benefit of any claimants against the licensee to secure the faithful performance of the obligations of the licensee under this Article. The aggregate liability of the surety shall not exceed the principal sum of the bond. A party having a claim against the licensee may bring suit directly on the surety bond, or the Commissioner may bring suit on behalf of any claimants, either in one action or in successive actions. Consumer claims shall be given priority in recovering from the bond. When an action is commenced on a licensee’s bond, the Commissioner may require the filing of a new bond. In this case, the licensee shall file a replacement bond in the required amount within 30 days. Immediately upon recovery upon any action on the bond the licensee shall file a new bond.

In the Commissioner’s discretion and upon written request of the licensee, the Commissioner may waive the requirement of the bond for any licensee, if:

The licensee has been licensed by the Commissioner for at least three years;

The licensee can demonstrate a net worth, according to the most recent audited financial statement, at least four times the required bond amount, and the licensee certifies that its net worth will be maintained at or above this level at all times and agrees to notify the Commissioner and to secure an appropriate bond in the event the net worth falls below this level;

The Commissioner believes the licensee has a satisfactory history of resolving complaints from consumers and responding to findings of investigations or examinations by the Commissioner; and

The Commissioner has no reason to believe the licensee will be unable to resolve complaints, respond to examination or investigative findings, or fulfill financial obligations under this Article.

If the Commissioner has waived the bond requirement of a licensee based on subsection (d) of this section, the Commissioner may summarily reinstate the bond requirement on any licensee if the Commissioner has reason to believe the licensee no longer meets the standards in subsection (d) of this section. In this event, the licensee shall submit a bond, as required in subsection (b) of this section, within 30 days. Failure to submit a bond as directed by the Commissioner shall be grounds for summary suspension.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2013-327, s. 7; 2015-293, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-327, s. 7, effective September 1, 2013, added “or transitional mortgage loan originator” twice in subsection (a). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2015-293, s. 1, effective November 1, 2015, added “Except as provided in subsection (a1) of this section” at the beginning of subsection (a); and added subsection (a1). For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 53-244.104.
Minimum net worth requirements.

A minimum net worth shall be continuously maintained for licensees in accordance with this section. In the event that the mortgage loan originator or transitional mortgage loan originator is an employee or exclusive agent of a person subject to this Article, the net worth of the person subject to this Article can be used in lieu of the mortgage loan originator’s or transitional mortgage loan originator’s minimum net worth requirement. The minimum net worth to be maintained for each license is as follows:

If the licensee is a mortgage lender, it shall maintain a net worth of at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), including evidence of liquidity of one million dollars ($1,000,000), which may include a warehouse line of credit of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or other evidence of funding capacity to conduct mortgage originations as documented by an unqualified audited statement of financial condition.

If the licensee is a mortgage servicer, it shall maintain a net worth of at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), not including monies in any escrow accounts held for others.

If the licensee is a mortgage broker, it shall maintain a net worth of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), including evidence of liquidity of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), as certified by the licensee in a certified statement of financial condition.

The Commissioner may adopt rules to require additional minimum net worth or otherwise amend net worth requirements as are necessary to ensure licensees maintain adequate financial responsibility and accomplish the purposes of this Article.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2013-327, s. 8.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-327, s. 8, effective September 1, 2013, in the second sentence of subsection (a), added “or transitional mortgage loan originator” and added “or transitional mortgage loan originator’s.” For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 53-244.105.
Records, addresses, escrow funds, or trust accounts.

Every licensee or registrant shall make and keep the accounts, correspondence, memoranda, papers, books, and other records as prescribed in rules adopted by the Commissioner. All records shall be preserved for three years unless the Commissioner, by rule, prescribes otherwise for particular types of records.

No person shall make any false statement or knowingly and willfully make any omission of a material fact in connection with any information or reports filed with the Commissioner, a governmental agency, or the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry or in connection with any oral or written communication with the Commissioner or another governmental agency. If the information contained in any document filed with the Commissioner or the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry is or becomes inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect, the licensee, registrant, or exempt entity shall within 30 days file a correcting amendment to the information contained in the document.

The Commissioner may, by rule, impose terms and conditions under which the records and files of a mortgage lender, mortgage broker, mortgage servicer, or mortgage origination support registrant may be maintained outside of this State. Except for a mortgage origination support registrant, a principal place of business shall not be located at an individual’s home or residence. A mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage servicer licensee, or a mortgage origination support registrant, shall maintain a record of the principal place of business with the Commissioner and report any change of address of the principal place of business or any branch office within 15 days after the change.

A licensee shall maintain in a segregated escrow fund or trust account any funds which come into the licensee’s possession but which are not the licensee’s property and which the licensee is not entitled to retain under the circumstances. The escrow fund or trust account shall be held on deposit in a federally insured financial institution. Individual loan applicants’ or borrowers’ accounts may be aggregated into a common trust fund so long as (i) interests in the common fund can be individually tracked and accounted for and (ii) the common fund is kept separate from and is not commingled with the licensee’s own funds.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2015-293, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-293, s. 1, effective November 1, 2015, inserted “or registrant” near the beginning of subsection (a); inserted “registrant” in the second sentence of subsection (b); and rewrote subsection (c). For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 53-244.106.
Display of license.

Each mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensed under this Article shall display, in plain public view, the certificate of licensure issued by the Commissioner in its principal office and in each branch office. Each mortgage loan originator or transitional mortgage loan originator licensed under this Article shall display, in plain public view, in each branch office in which the individual acts as a mortgage loan originator or transitional mortgage loan originator the certificate of licensure issued by the Commissioner.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2013-327, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-327, s. 9, effective September 1, 2013, added “or transitional mortgage loan originator” twice in the second sentence of this section. For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 53-244.107.
Unique identifier shown.

The unique identifier of any mortgage loan originator, transitional mortgage loan originator, or other person engaged in the mortgage business as defined in G.S. 53-244.030(11) shall be clearly shown on all residential mortgage loan application forms, solicitations, advertisements, including business cards or Web sites, and any other documents as established by rule or order of the Commissioner.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2013-327, s. 10.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-327, s. 10, effective September 1, 2013, inserted “transitional mortgage loan originator” near the beginning of this section. For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 53-244.108.
Reports.

Each mortgage lender, mortgage broker, mortgage servicer licensee, or mortgage origination support registrant shall submit to the Commissioner and to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry reports of condition and any other reports requested by the Commissioner pursuant to G.S. 53-244.115(d). The reports shall be in the form and shall contain any information that the Commissioner or Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry may require.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2015-293, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-293, s. 1, effective November 1, 2015, inserted “or mortgage origination support registrant” in the first sentence; and made related changes. For applicability, see editor’s note.